Utah statutes.
34A-2-502.   Intensity tests.

(1)  The commission may conduct tests to determine the intensity of noise at places of employment.

(2)  An administrative law judge may consider tests conducted by the commission, and any other tests taken by authorities in the field of sound engineering, as evidence of harmful industrial noise.

